Florida, session 2026, SB880.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (136) is added to section 320.08058, 13 Florida Statutes, to read: 14 320.08058âSpecialty license plates.â 15 (136)âMIAMI NORTHWESTERN ALUMNI ASSOCIATION LICENSE 16 PLATES.â 17 (a)âThe department shall develop a Miami Northwestern 18 Alumni Association license plate as provided in this section and 19 s. 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved 20 by the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of 21 the plate, and the words âMiami Northwestern Alumni Associationâ 22 must appear at the bottom of the plate. 23 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 24 distributed to the Miami Northwestern Alumni Association, Inc., 25 which may use up to 10 percent of the fees for administrative 26 costs and marketing of the plate. The balance of the fees must 27 be used by the Miami Northwestern Alumni Association, Inc., to 28 fund academic programs, athletic programs, and need-based 29 scholarships for the benefit of Miami Northwestern Senior High 30 School students and the Miami Northwestern Senior High School 31 Performing and Visual Arts Center. 32 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.